Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-15,112
Local housing agency; general powers.

(1) A local housing agency shall possess all powers necessary, convenient, or desirable in carrying out the purposes of the Nebraska Housing Agency Act, exercising any power provided in the act, and engaging in any activity related to furthering the purposes of the act. Such powers shall include, but shall expressly not be limited to, the powers enumerated in this section and section 71-15,113 or stated elsewhere in the act or in other applicable law.

(2) The powers enumerated in the act may be exercised singly or in any combination. The enumeration of any power shall not require, expressly or by implication, that any local housing agency is required to exercise such power.

Laws 1999, LB 105, § 41.